Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.240

Intersection control area.

"Intersection control area" means intersection area, together with such modification of the adjacent roadway area as results from the arc of curb corners and together with any marked or unmarked crosswalks adjacent to the intersection.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.240. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 25; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]